Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5950.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-2 of the General Laws entitled "General Powers" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-2-70. Reimbursement of public safety training expenses.
(a) Any law enforcement agency, fire department, fire district or emergency medical
services organization within the state that hires a public safety employee (including law
enforcement officers, firefighters, or emergency medical personnel) from another municipality or
fire district within the state shall, upon hiring such personnel, reimburse the original employing
municipality or fire district for the cost of training and equipping the employee, provided these
costs were incurred within three (3) years of the employee's hire.
(b) Reimbursable expenses shall include, but are not limited to:
(1) Costs for basic and specialized training programs;
(2) Uniforms, personal protective equipment, and other non-reusable items;
(3) Equipment and materials directly provided during the training period; and
(4) A prorated portion of the base salary and benefits paid during the training academy
period.
(c) The reimbursing organization shall notify the original employing municipality or fire
district within ten (10) days of the employee's hire. The original employer shall provide an itemized
statement of reimbursable costs within thirty (30) days of notification. Payment must be made
within one hundred twenty (120) days of receipt of the itemized claim.

(d) Reimbursement percentages are determined based on the time elapsed since the
completion of training:
(1) One hundred percent (100%) reimbursement for hires made within one year of training
academy completion;
(2) Seventy-five percent (75%) reimbursement for hires between one and two (2) years
after training academy completion;
(3) Fifty percent (50%) reimbursement for hires between two (2) and three (3) years after
training academy completion.
(e) This section supersedes any conflicting municipal policies, resolutions, charter
provisions or bylaws, or ordinances.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002047
========
LC002047 - Page 2 of 3